Utah statutes.
78B-5-613.   Proof of publication of document, notice, or order.

(1) (a)  If a court or judge orders a document or notice published in a newspaper, evidence of the publication shall be made by affidavit of the publisher, the publisher's foreman, or principal clerk with a copy of the publication attached.

(b)  The affidavit shall state the date and newspaper of publication.

(2) (a)  If a court or judge orders a document or notice published electronically in accordance with Section 45-1-101, evidence of the publication shall be made by affidavit of the website publisher or the website publisher's designee with a printed copy of the publication attached.

(b)  The affidavit shall state the date of publication.

